Hawaii statutes.
§53-17 Bonds of agency to be legal
investments. Bonds issued by a redevelopment agency in connection with one
or more redevelopment plans or redevelopment projects pursuant to this part
shall be legal investments and security for public deposits to the same extent
and for the same public officers and bodies, political subdivisions, persons,
companies, corporations, associations, banks, institutions, and fiduciaries as
bonds or obligations issued by the Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation under chapter 201H in connection with slum clearance and housing
projects. [L 1949, c 379, pt of §4; RL 1955, §143-17; HRS §53-17; am L 1987, c
337, §5(2); am L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16; am L 2007, c 249,
§10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next